Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4307
(UDTA 7) Limitation on trust director.

(UDTA 7) A trust director is subject to the same rules as a trustee in a like position and under similar circumstances in the exercise or nonexercise of a power of direction or further power under subdivision (b)(1) of section 30-4306 regarding:

(1) a payback provision in the terms of a trust necessary to comply with the medicaid reimbursement requirements of section 68-919; and

(2) a charitable interest in the trust, including notice regarding the interest to the Attorney General.

Laws 2019, LB536, § 7.